Georgia, session 2025_26, SB135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Coastal Island Preservation Act."
SECTION 2.
Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions regarding parks, historic areas, memorials, and recreation, is amended by
adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"12-3-13.
In furtherance of the protection of the cultural heritage and preservation of the natural
resources, environment, and vital areas of this state, on the coastal islands of this state that
are not accessible by bridge, it shall be unlawful for any person to construct, assemble, or
S. B. 135
- 1 -

LC 44 3015
otherwise erect any new single-family residential structure exceeding the square footage
of the largest such structure existing on any such island as of July 11, 1995."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 135
- 2 -